Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1413.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 6-101.9 of Title 70, unless
there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. A public school district in this state that employs a
teacher who has been issued an emergency certificate pursuant to
subsection G of Section 6-187 of Title 70 of the Oklahoma Statutes
shall provide written notification to the parents and legal
guardians of students who are in the teacher’s class. The

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1413 SFLR Page 1
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

noti fication shall include the name of the teacher issued the
emergency certificate and the classes he or she teaches.
B. The requirements of subsection A of this section shall apply
to any teacher who has been issued an emergency certificate and is
employed by a school district upon the effective date of this act.
SECTION 2. AMENDATORY 70 O.S. 2021, Section 6-122.3, as
last amended by Section 162, Chapter 452, O.S.L. 2024 (70 O.S. Supp.
2025, Section 6-122.3), is amended to read as follows:
Section 6-122.3. A. The State Board of Education shall grant
an alternative placement teaching certificate to a person who makes
application to the Board and meets the following criteria:
1. a. holds at least a baccalaureate degree from an
institution whose accreditation is recognized by the
Oklahoma State Regents for Higher Education and has
attained a retention grade point average of not less
than 2.50 on a 4.0 scale, or
b. has successfully completed a terminal degree, such as
a doctorate of philosophy, a doctorate in education,
professional doctorates, a master of fine arts degree,
or a master of library science degree, from an
institution accredited by a national or regional
accrediting agency which is recognized by the
Secretary of the United States Department Secretary of
Education. The Oklahoma State Regents for Higher
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1413 SFLR Page 2
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

Education shall be consulted to verify other terminal
degrees, or
c. holds at least a baccalaureate degree from an
institution whose accreditation is recognized by the
Oklahoma State Regents for Higher Education and has
qualified work experience in a field that corresponds
to an area of certification as determined by the State
Board of Education, and
d. in addition to the requirements of subparagraphs a, b,
and or c of this paragraph, has demonstrated
competency or completed a major in a field that
corresponds to an area of specialization for an
Elementary-Secondary Certificate or a Secondary
Certificate as determined by the State Board of
Education or a vocational-technical certificate as
recommended by the Oklahoma Department of Career and
Technology Education;
2. Declares the intention to earn standard certification by
means of an alternative placement program in not more than three (3)
years. The State Board of Education shall determine the subject
matter and the number of clock or semester hours required for the
professional education component for each person making application
for an alternative placement teaching certificate based on the
criteria of paragraph 1 of this subsection.
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1413 SFLR Page 3
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

The State Board of Education shall establish a core minimum of
six (6) semester hours or ninety (90) clock hours and a maximum of
eighteen (18) semester hours or two hundred seventy (270) clock
hours for the professional education component.
The requirements set forth in this subsection shall exclude all
student teaching requirements pursuant to the provisions of
subsection E F of this section;
3. Has passed the subject area portion of the competency
examination required in Section 6-187 of this title in the area of
specialization for which certification is sought; and
4. Either presents a document from an accredited public school
district in this state offering employment in the area of
specialization for which certification is sought on condition that
the person enroll in an alternative placement program approved by
the State Board of Education or declares the intention to seek
employment as a teacher at an accredited public school district in
this state. The certificate granted pursuant to this subsection
shall be considered a “valid valid certificate of qualification”
qualification for the purposes of Sections 6-107 and 6-108 of this
title, and the holder of the certificate shall be considered an
inductee for the purposes of Section 6-195 of this title.
B. An alternative placement teaching certificate shall be
renewed for not more than a maximum of three (3) years upon
presentation of a document from an accredited public school district
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1413 SFLR Page 4
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

in t his state offering renewed employment in the same area of
specialization and a document from a teacher education institution
verifying satisfactory progress in an appropriate alternative
placement program.
C. Persons enrolled in an alternative placement program shall:
1. Have never been denied admittance to a teacher education
program approved by the Oklahoma State Regents for Higher Education,
the North Central Association of Colleges and Schools Higher
Learning Commission, and by the Oklahoma Commission for Teacher
Preparation Educational Quality and Accountability to offer teacher
education programs, nor have enrolled in and subsequently failed
courses necessary to successfully meet the minimum requirements of
the program, except those persons who hold a certificate;
2. Have on file with the director of teacher education at an
Oklahoma institution of higher education in this state a plan for
meeting standard certification requirements within three (3) years;
and
3. Participate in an induction program as required in Section
6-195 of this title and have the same duties and responsibilities as
other inductees.
D. The State Board of Education may grant an exception to the
requirements for certification and, upon demonstration by an
individual of specific competency in the subject area of
specialization, may grant a certificate to the individual. The
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1413 SFLR Page 5
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

Stat e Board of Education may establish other requirements necessary
to grant exceptions.
E. The State Board of Education, in consultation with the
Commission for Educational Quality and Accountability, may grant an
exception to the requirement to complete a subject area examination
for initial certification in a field which does not require an
advanced degree pursuant to this section if the candidate has an
advanced degree in a subject that is substantially comparable to the
content assessed on a subject area examination. The degree shall be
from an institution accredited by a national or regional accrediting
agency which is recognized by the United States Secretary of the
U.S. Department of Education. The Commission shall provide the
Board with the necessary information to determine comparability.
F. Student teaching and a prestudent teaching field experience
shall not be required of alternative placement program participants
for standard certification.
G. The State Board of Education shall promulgate rules
authorizing adjunct teachers who shall be persons with distinguished
qualifications in their field. Adjunct teachers shall not be
required to meet standard certification. A person employed as an
adjunct teacher pursuant to this subsection who does not hold a
valid certificate to teach shall not be considered a teacher as
defined by Section 1-116 of this title and shall be limited to two

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1413 SFLR Page 6
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

hund red seventy (270) clock hours of classroom teaching per
semester.
H. Each teacher education institution shall provide the
Oklahoma Commission for Teacher Preparation Educational Quality and
Accountability an annual report of information as specified by the
Commission regarding participation in the alternative placement
programs offered by the institution.
I. The Oklahoma Commission for Teacher Preparation Educational
Quality and Accountability shall not accredit, renew the
accreditation of, or otherwise approve any teacher education program
of any institution of higher education in this state that has not
implemented alternative placement programs in at least four areas of
specialization including mathematics, science, and a foreign
language. Each institution shall allow individuals who meet the
criteria of subsections A and C of this section to be:
1. Admitted to an alternative placement program without further
qualification; and
2. Offered the opportunity to complete the requirements for
standard certification set forth in subsection A of this section
during the summer preceding and the summer following the first year
of teaching with an alternative placement teaching certificate. Any
person seeking standard certification through an alternative
placement program shall be permitted to take necessary courses
during regular semesters if offered.
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1413 SFLR Page 7
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

J. The criteria specified in subsection I of this section can
may be met through a cooperative arrangement entered into by two or
more institutions of higher education.
SECTION 3. This act shall become effective July 1, 2026.
SECTION 4. It being immediately necessary for the preservation
of the public peace, health, or safety, an emergency is hereby
declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and
be in full force from and after its passage and approval.
COMMITTEE REPORT BY: COMMITTEE ON EDUCATION
February 10, 2026 - DO PASS















SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1413 SFLR Page 8
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)